Utah statutes.
53-8-204.   Division duties -- Official inspection stations -- Permits --
Fees -- Suspension or revocation -- Utah-based interstate commercial motor
carriers.
(1)  The division shall:
(a)  conduct examinations of every safety inspection station permit applicant
and safety inspector certificate applicant to determine whether the applicant
is properly equipped and qualified to make safety inspections;
(b)  issue safety inspection station permits and safety inspector certificates
to qualified applicants;
(c)  establish application, renewal, and reapplication fees in accordance with
Section  63J-1-504 for safety inspection station permits and safety inspector
certificates;
(d)  provide instructions and all necessary forms, including safety inspection
certificates, to safety inspection stations for the inspection of motor
vehicles and the issuance of the safety inspection certificates;
(e)  charge a $2 fee for each safety inspection certificate;
(f)  investigate complaints regarding safety inspection stations and safety
inspectors;
(g)  compile and publish all applicable safety inspection laws, rules,
instructions, and standards and distribute them to all safety inspection
stations and provide updates to the compiled laws, rules, instructions, and
standards as needed;
(h)  establish a fee in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 to cover the cost of
compiling and publishing the safety inspection laws, rules, instructions, and
standards and any updates; and
(i)  assist the council in conducting its meetings and hearings.
(2) (a) (i)  Receipts from the fees established in accordance with Subsection
(1)(h) are fixed collections to be used by the division for the expenses of
the Utah Highway Patrol incurred under Subsection (1)(h).
(ii)  Funds received in excess of the expenses under Subsection (1)(h) shall
be deposited in the Transportation Fund.
(b) (i)  The first $.75 of the fee under Subsection (1)(e) is a dedicated
credit to be used solely by the Utah Highway Patrol for the expenses of
administering this section.
(ii)  The remaining funds collected under Subsection (1)(e) shall be deposited
in the Transportation Fund.
(iii)  The dedicated credits described under Subsection (2)(b)(i) are in
addition to any other appropriations provided to administer the safety
inspection program duties under this section.
(3)  The division may:
(a)  before issuing a safety inspection permit, require  an applicant, other
than a fleet station or government station, to file a bond that will provide a
guarantee that the applicant safety inspection station will make compensation
for any damage to a motor vehicle during an inspection or adjustment due to
negligence on the part of an applicant or the applicant’s employees;
(b)  establish procedures governing the issuance of safety inspection
certificates to Utah-based interstate commercial motor carriers;
(c)  suspend, revoke, or refuse renewal of any safety inspection station
permit issued when the division finds that the safety inspection station is
not:
(i)  properly equipped; or
(ii)  complying with rules made by the  division; and
(d)  suspend, revoke, or refuse renewal of any safety inspection station
permit or safety inspector certificate issued when the station or inspector
has violated any safety inspection law or rule.
(4)  The division shall maintain a record of safety inspection station permits
and safety inspector certificates issued, suspended, revoked, or refused
renewal under Subsection (3)(c).
(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division shall make rules:
(a)  setting minimum standards covering the design, construction, condition,
and operation of motor vehicle equipment for safely operating a motor vehicle
on the highway;
(b)  establishing motor vehicle safety inspection procedures to ensure a motor
vehicle can be operated safely;
(c)  establishing safety inspection station building, equipment, and personnel
requirements necessary to qualify to perform safety inspections;
(d)  establishing age, training, examination, and renewal requirements to
qualify for a safety inspector certificate;
(e)  establishing program guidelines for a school district that elects to
implement a safety inspection apprenticeship program for high school students;
(f)  establishing requirements:
(i)  designed to protect consumers from unwanted or unneeded repairs or
adjustments;
(ii)  for maintaining safety inspection records;
(iii)  for providing reports to the division; and
(iv)  for maintaining and protecting safety inspection certificates;
(g)  establishing procedures for a motor vehicle that fails a safety
inspection;
(h)  setting bonding amounts for safety inspection stations if bonds are
required under Subsection (3)(a); and
(i)  establishing procedures for a safety inspection station to follow if the
station is going out of business.
(6)  The rules of the division:
(a)  shall conform as nearly as practical to federal motor vehicle safety
standards including 49 CFR 393, 396, 396 Appendix G, and Federal Motor Vehicle
Safety Standards 205; and
(b)  may incorporate by reference, in whole or in part, the federal standards
under Subsection (6)(a) and nationally recognized and readily available
standards and codes on motor vehicle safety.
